Washington statutes.
RCW 5.48.051

Costs to be taxed.

The costs to be taxed, upon an application to restore a lost or destroyed record, shall be the same as are provided for like service in civil actions, and may be adjudged against either or any party to such proceeding or application, or may, in the discretion of the court, be apportioned between such parties.

[ 1890 p 339 s 6; RRS s 1275. Formerly RCW 5.48.070, part.]